North Carolina, session 2025, SB826.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-28.2. Fiscal transparency and accessibility.
In order to allow the citizens of this State to see and better understand how revenue of the
State is being expended, The University of North Carolina and each principal department under
Chapters 143A and 143B of the General Statutes shall collate and report monthly to, in a form
prescribed by, the Department of Administration an itemized list of all expenditures of the entity
with a cost of at least one dollar ($1.00) for the purchase of tangible personal property, real
property, and services, along with the sum total expenditures for the month. Within 10 days of
receiving a report required by this section, the Department of Administration shall publish the
report on its website in a form accessible to the public for viewing and inspection. Nothing in
this section shall be interpreted to make public any records that are confidential or otherwise
protected from disclosure by State or federal law."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 7A-343 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-343. Duties of Director.
The Director is the Administrative Officer of the Courts, and the Director's duties include all
of the following:
…
(9h) In order to allow the citizens of this State to see and better understand how the
revenue of the State is being expended, the courts of the State shall collate and
report monthly to, in a form prescribed by, the Director an itemized list of all
expenditures of each court with a cost of at least one dollar ($1.00) for the
purchase of tangible personal property, real property, and services, along with
the sum total expenditures for the month. Within 10 days of receiving a report
required by this section, the Director shall publish the report on its website in
a form accessible to the public for viewing and inspection. Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to make public any records that are confidential or
otherwise protected from disclosure by State or federal law.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 7 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 120-32.05. Fiscal transparency and accessibility.
*S826-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
In order to allow the citizens of this State to see and better understand how the revenue of the
State is being expended, the Legislative Services Officer shall collate an itemized list of all
expenditures of the General Assembly with a cost of at least one dollar ($1.00) for the purchase
of tangible personal property, real property, and services, along with the sum total expenditures
for the month. Within 10 days of creating the list required by this section, the Legislative Services
Officer shall publish the report on its website in a form accessible to the public for viewing and
inspection. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to make public any records that are
confidential or otherwise protected from disclosure by State or federal law."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund the following amounts to
the following entities in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for purposes of
implementing the provisions of this act:
(1) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the Department of
Administration for allocation to the affected departments.
(2) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to The University of North Carolina.
(3) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(4) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and the publications required
by this act apply on October 1, 2026, and shall include expenditures beginning with the
2026-2027 fiscal year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 826-First Edition